Wisconsin, session 2025, SB811.
do enact as follows:SB811,14Section 1. Fiscal changes.SB811,2,65(1) Regional farmer support. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 6appropriation to the department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection 1under s. 20.115 (3) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by 2$150,400 to increase the authorized FTE positions for the department by 2.0 GPR 3positions for regional farmer support. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 4appropriation to the department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection 5under s. 20.115 (3) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by 6$200,500 to provide funding for the positions authorized under this subsection.SB811,2,77